Nevada, session 83, AB247.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 241.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
241.020 1. Except as otherwise provided by specific statute,
all meetings of public bodies must be open and public, and all
persons must be permitted to attend any meeting of these public
bodies at a physical location or by means of a remote technology
system. A meeting that is closed pursuant to a specific statute may
only be closed to the extent specified in the statute allowing the
meeting to be closed. All other portions of the meeting must be open
and public, and the public body must comply with all other
provisions of this chapter to the extent not specifically precluded by
the specific statute. Public officers and employees responsible for
these meetings shall make reasonable efforts to assist and
accommodate persons with physical disabilities desiring to attend [.]
, including, without limitation, providing at public meetings:
(a) In person or by electronic means, a person who is a
qualified interpreter, as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 35.104; and
(b) Communication Access Realtime Translation.
2. If any portion of a meeting is open to the public, the public
officers and employees responsible for the meeting must make
reasonable efforts to ensure the facilities for the meeting are large
enough to accommodate the anticipated number of attendees. No
violation of this chapter occurs if a member of the public is not
permitted to attend a public meeting because the facilities for the
meeting have reached maximum capacity if reasonable efforts were
taken to accommodate the anticipated number of attendees. Nothing
in this subsection requires a public body to incur any costs to secure
a facility outside the control or jurisdiction of the public body or to
upgrade, improve or otherwise modify an existing facility to
accommodate the anticipated number of attendees.
3. Except in an emergency, written notice of all meetings must
be given at least 3 working days before the meeting. The notice
must include:
-
*AB247_R1*

– 3 –
(a) The time, place and location of the meeting. If the meeting is
held using a remote technology system pursuant to NRS 241.023
and has no physical location, the notice must include information on
how a member of the public may:
(1) Use the remote technology system to hear and observe
the meeting;
(2) Participate in the meeting by telephone; and
(3) Provide live public comment during the meeting and, if
authorized by the public body, provide prerecorded public comment.
(b) A list of the locations where the notice has been posted.
(c) The name, contact information and business address for the
person designated by the public body from whom a member of the
public may request the supporting material for the meeting
described in subsection 7 and:
(1) A list of the locations where the supporting material is
available to the public; or
(2) Information about how the supporting material may be
found on the Internet website of the public body.
(d) An agenda consisting of:
(1) A clear and complete statement of the topics scheduled to
be considered during the meeting.
(2) A list describing the items on which action may be taken
and clearly denoting that action may be taken on those items by
placing the term “for possible action” next to the appropriate item
or, if the item is placed on the agenda pursuant to NRS 241.0365, by
placing the term “for possible corrective action” next to the
appropriate item.
(3) Periods devoted to comments by the general public, if
any, and discussion of those comments.
(4) If any portion of the meeting will be closed to consider
the character, alleged misconduct or professional competence of a
person, the name of the person whose character, alleged misconduct
or professional competence will be considered.
(5) If, during any portion of the meeting, the public body will
consider whether to take administrative action regarding a person,
the name of that person.
(6) Notification that:
(I) Items on the agenda may be taken out of order;
(II) The public body may combine two or more agenda
items for consideration; and
(III) The public body may remove an item from the
agenda or delay discussion relating to an item on the agenda at any
time.
(7) Any restrictions on comments by the general public. Any
such restrictions must be reasonable and may restrict the time, place
-
*AB247_R1*

– 4 –
and manner of the comments, but may not restrict comments based
upon viewpoint.
(8) If the meeting is being held using a remote technology
system pursuant to NRS 241.023 and does not have a physical
location designated for the meeting where members of the general
public are permitted to attend and participate, clear and complete
instructions for a member of the general public to be able to call in
to the meeting to provide public comment, including, without
limitation, a telephone number and any necessary identification
number of the meeting or other access code.
4. Minimum public notice is:
(a) Posting a copy of the notice at the principal office of the
public body or, if the meeting has a physical location, at the building
in which the meeting is to be held. If the meeting is held using a
remote technology system pursuant to NRS 241.023 and has no
physical location, the public body must also post the notice to the
Internet website of the public body not later than 9 a.m. of the third
working day before the meeting is to be held unless the public body
is unable to do so because of technical problems relating to the
operation or maintenance of the Internet website of the public body.
(b) Posting the notice on the official website of the State
pursuant to NRS 232.2175 not later than 9 a.m. of the third working
day before the meeting is to be held, unless the public body is
unable to do so because of technical problems relating to the
operation or maintenance of the official website of the State.
(c) Providing a copy of the notice to any person who has
requested notice of the meetings of the public body. A request for
notice lapses 6 months after it is made. The public body shall inform
the requester of this fact by enclosure with, notation upon or text
included within the first notice sent. The notice must be:
(1) Delivered to the postal service used by the public body
not later than 9 a.m. of the third working day before the meeting for
transmittal to the requester by regular mail; or
(2) Transmitted to the requester by electronic mail sent not
later than 9 a.m. of the third working day before the meeting.
5. For each of its meetings, a public body shall document in
writing that the public body complied with the minimum public
notice required by paragraph (a) of subsection 4. The documentation
must be prepared by every person who posted a copy of the public
notice and include, without limitation:
(a) The date and time when the person posted the copy of the
public notice;
(b) The address of the location where the person posted the copy
of the public notice; and
-
*AB247_R1*

– 5 –
(c) The name, title and signature of the person who posted the
copy of the notice.
6. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (a) of subsection
4, if a public body maintains a website on the Internet or its
successor, the public body shall post notice of each of its meetings
on its website unless the public body is unable to do so because of
technical problems relating to the operation or maintenance of its
website. Notice posted pursuant to this subsection is supplemental to
and is not a substitute for the minimum public notice required
pursuant to subsection 4. The inability of a public body to post
notice of a meeting pursuant to this subsection as a result of
technical problems with its website shall not be deemed to be a
violation of the provisions of this chapter.
7. Upon any request, a public body shall provide, at no charge,
at least one copy of:
(a) An agenda for a public meeting;
(b) A proposed ordinance or regulation which will be discussed
at the public meeting; and
(c) Subject to the provisions of subsection 8 or 9, as applicable,
any other supporting material provided to the members of the public
body for an item on the agenda, except materials:
(1) Submitted to the public body pursuant to a nondisclosure
or confidentiality agreement which relates to proprietary
information;
(2) Pertaining to the closed portion of such a meeting of the
public body; or
(3) Declared confidential by law, unless otherwise agreed to
by each person whose interest is being protected under the order of
confidentiality.
 The public body shall make at least one copy of the documents
described in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) available to the public at the
meeting to which the documents pertain. As used in this subsection,
“proprietary information” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 332.025.
8. Unless it must be made available at an earlier time pursuant
to NRS 288.153, a copy of supporting material required to be
provided upon request pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 7
must be:
(a) If the supporting material is provided to the members of the
public body before the meeting, made available to the requester at
the time the material is provided to the members of the public body;
or
(b) If the supporting material is provided to the members of the
public body at the meeting, made available at the meeting to the
-
*AB247_R1*

– 6 –
requester at the same time the material is provided to the members
of the public body.
 If the requester has agreed to receive the information and material
set forth in subsection 7 by electronic mail, the public body shall, if
feasible, provide the information and material by electronic mail.
9. Unless the supporting material must be posted at an earlier
time pursuant to NRS 288.153, and except as otherwise provided in
subsection 11, the governing body of a county or city whose
population is 52,000 or more shall post the supporting material
described in paragraph (c) of subsection 7 to its website not later
than the time the material is provided to the members of the
governing body or, if the supporting material is provided to the
members of the governing body at a meeting, not later than 24 hours
after the conclusion of the meeting. Such posting is supplemental to
the right of the public to request the supporting material pursuant to
subsection 7. The inability of the governing body, as a result of
technical problems with its website, to post supporting material
pursuant to this subsection shall not be deemed to be a violation of
the provisions of this chapter.
10. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 11, a public
body may provide the public notice, information or supporting
material required by this section by electronic mail. Except as
otherwise provided in this subsection, if a public body makes such
notice, information or supporting material available by electronic
mail, the public body shall inquire of a person who requests the
notice, information or supporting material if the person will accept
receipt by electronic mail. If a public body is required to post the
public notice, information or supporting material on its website
pursuant to this section, the public body shall inquire of a person
who requests the notice, information or supporting material if the
person will accept by electronic mail a link to the posting on the
website when the documents are made available. The inability of a
public body, as a result of technical problems with its electronic
mail system, to provide a public notice, information or supporting
material or a link to a website required by this section to a person
who has agreed to receive such notice, information, supporting
material or link by electronic mail shall not be deemed to be a
violation of the provisions of this chapter.
11. If a public body holds a meeting using a remote technology
system pursuant to NRS 241.023 and has no physical location for
the meeting, the public body must:
(a) Have an Internet website; and
(b) Post to its Internet website:
(1) The public notice required by this section; and
-
*AB247_R1*

– 7 –
(2) Supporting material not later than the time the material is
provided to the members of the governing body or, if the supporting
material is provided to the members of the governing body at a
meeting, not later than 24 hours after the conclusion of the meeting.
 The inability of the governing body, as a result of technical
problems with its Internet website, to post supporting material
pursuant to this subsection shall not be deemed to be a violation of
the provisions of this chapter.
12. As used in this section [, “emergency”] :
(a) “Communication Access Realtime Translation” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 656A.025.
(b) “Emergency” means an unforeseen circumstance which
requires immediate action and includes, but is not limited to:
[(a)] (1) Disasters caused by fire, flood, earthquake or other
natural causes; or
[(b)] (2) Any impairment of the health and safety of the public.
Sec. 2. NRS 338.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
338.180 1. The Legislature of the State of Nevada declares
that:
(a) The primary purpose of this section is to provide, subject to
the limitations set forth in this section, for the removal and
elimination of architectural barriers to persons with a physical
handicap in public buildings and facilities designed after July 1,
1973, in order to encourage and facilitate the employment of
persons with a physical handicap and to make public buildings
accessible to and usable by persons with a physical handicap; and
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that insofar as possible all
buildings and facilities used by the public be accessible to, and
functional for, persons with a physical handicap, without loss of
function, space or facility where the general public is concerned.
2. All plans and specifications for the construction of public
buildings and facilities owned by a public body must, after July 1,
1973, provide facilities and features for persons with a physical
handicap so that buildings which are normally used by the public are
constructed with entrance ramps, toilet facilities, drinking fountains,
doors and public telephones accessible to and usable by persons
with a physical handicap. In addition, all plans and specifications for
the construction or alteration of public buildings and facilities
owned by a public body must comply with the applicable
requirements of the:
(a) Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. §§
12101 et seq., and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto,
including, without limitation, the Americans with Disabilities Act
Accessibility Guidelines for Buildings and Facilities set forth in
-
*AB247_R1*

– 8 –
Appendix A of Part 36 of Title 28 of the Code of Federal
Regulations;
(b) Minimum Guidelines and Requirements for Accessible
Design, 36 C.F.R. §§ 1190.1 et seq.; and
(c) Fair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C. § 3604, and the regulations
adopted pursuant thereto.
 The requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection are not
satisfied if the plans and specifications comply solely with the
Uniform Federal Accessibility Standards set forth in Appendix A of
Part 101-19.6 of Title 41 of the Code of Federal Regulations.
3. All public bodies shall, in the design, construction and
alteration of public buildings and facilities comply with the
applicable requirements of the:
(a) Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. §§
12101 et seq., and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto,
including, without limitation, the Americans with Disabilities Act
Accessibility Guidelines for Buildings and Facilities set forth in
Appendix A of Part 36 of Title 28 of the Code of Federal
Regulations;
(b) Minimum Guidelines and Requirements for Accessible
Design, 36 C.F.R. §§ 1190.1 et seq.; and
(c) Fair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C. § 3604, and the regulations
adopted pursuant thereto.
 The requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection are not
satisfied if the public body complies solely with the Uniform
Federal Accessibility Standards set forth in Appendix A of Part 101-
19.6 of Title 41 of the Code of Federal Regulations.
4. In each public building and facility owned by a public body,
each entrance to a corridor which leads to a toilet facility must be
marked with a sign which:
(a) Conforms to the requirements related to signage contained in
§§ 4.30 et seq. of the Americans with Disabilities Act Accessibility
Guidelines for Buildings and Facilities set forth in Appendix A of
Part 36 of Title 28 of the Code of Federal Regulations; and
(b) Uses symbols, raised letters and Braille to:
(1) Identify the toilet facility and the gender of persons who
may use the toilet facility; and
(2) If the toilet facility is for the exclusive use of persons of
one gender:
(I) Indicate that the toilet facility is for the exclusive use
of persons of that gender; and
(II) Provide direction to a toilet facility that may be used
by persons of the other gender.
5. A public body that owns a public building or facility which
provides a single-stall restroom to the public shall make the
-
*AB247_R1*

– 9 –
single-stall restroom as inclusive and accessible as possible to a
person of any gender identity or expression, including, without
limitation, by allowing:
(a) A parent or guardian of a child to enter the single-stall
restroom with the child;
(b) A person with a disability to enter the single-stall restroom
with his or her caregiver, if applicable; and
(c) A person of any gender identity or expression to use the
single-stall restroom as needed.
 The public body that owns the public building or facility which
provides a single-stall restroom to the public shall not label the
single-stall restroom with gendered signage and may label the
single-stall restroom as available for use by any person, including,
without limitation, by posting a sign which reads “All-Gender
Bathroom” or “All-Accessible Bathroom.”
6. Each public building designed on or after July 1, 2025,
that is owned by a public body and in which a public meeting is
held pursuant to NRS 241.020 must include any equipment and
software necessary for Communication Access Realtime
Translation.
7. The Division shall verify that all public buildings and
facilities owned by the State of Nevada conform with the
requirements of this section. Each political subdivision shall verify
that all public buildings and facilities owned by the political
subdivision conform with the requirements of this section.
[7.] 8. A person may report a violation of this section to the
Attorney General.
[8.] 9. Upon receiving a report pursuant to subsection [7,] 8,
the Attorney General shall notify the public body responsible for the
alleged violation. Not later than 30 days after receiving such a
notification, the public body shall:
(a) Present evidence to the Attorney General that it is in
compliance with this section; or
(b) Begin any action necessary to comply with the requirements
of this section and notify the Attorney General of the date on which
it will be in compliance with those requirements.
[9.] 10. If the public body responsible for the alleged violation
fails to comply with this section, the Attorney General shall take
such action as is necessary to ensure compliance with this section,
including, without limitation, commencing proceedings in a court of
competent jurisdiction, if appropriate.
[10.] 11. The provisions of this section do not:
(a) Establish a private right of action against a public body
described in subsection 5 , 6 or [6;] 7; or
-
*AB247_R1*

– 10 –
(b) Authorize the filing of a complaint with the Nevada Equal
Rights Commission,
 for a violation of the provisions of subsection 5.
[11.] 12. As used in this section:
(a) “Caregiver” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449A.306.
(b) “Communication Access Realtime Translation” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 656A.025.
(c) “Gendered signage” means any sign posted on a single-stall
restroom that uses words or images of a person to denominate sex.
[(c)] (d) “Single-stall restroom” means a restroom that:
(1) Is intended for individual use; and
(2) Contains:
(I) A single toilet or a single urinal; or
(II) A toilet and a urinal, neither of which is separated
from the other by enclosure within a stall.
Sec. 3. NRS 389.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.520 1. The Council shall:
(a) Establish standards of content and performance, including,
without limitation, a prescription of the resulting level of
achievement, for the grade levels set forth in subsection 5, based
upon the content of each course, that is expected of pupils for the
following courses of study:
(1) English language arts;
(2) Mathematics;
(3) Science;
(4) Social studies, which includes only the subjects of
history, geography, economics, civics, financial literacy and
multicultural education;
(5) The arts;
(6) Computer education and technology, which includes
computer science and computational thinking;
(7) Health;
(8) Physical education; and
(9) A foreign or world language [.] , including, without
limitation, American Sign Language.
(b) Establish a schedule for the periodic review and, if
necessary, revision of the standards of content and performance. The
review must include, without limitation, the review required
pursuant to NRS 390.115 of the results of pupils on the
examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105.
(c) Assign priorities to the standards of content and performance
relative to importance and degree of emphasis and revise the
standards, if necessary, based upon the priorities.
-
*AB247_R1*

– 11 –
2. The standards for computer education and technology must
include a policy for the ethical, safe and secure use of computers
and other electronic devices. The policy must include, without
limitation:
(a) The ethical use of computers and other electronic devices,
including, without limitation:
(1) Rules of conduct for the acceptable use of the Internet
and other electronic devices; and
(2) Methods to ensure the prevention of:
(I) Cyber-bullying;
(II) Plagiarism; and
(III) The theft of information or data in an electronic
form;
(b) The safe use of computers and other electronic devices,
including, without limitation, methods to:
(1) Avoid cyber-bullying and other unwanted electronic
communication, including, without limitation, communication with
on-line predators;
(2) Recognize when an on-line electronic communication is
dangerous or potentially dangerous; and
(3) Report a dangerous or potentially dangerous on-line
electronic communication to the appropriate school personnel;
(c) The secure use of computers and other electronic devices,
including, without limitation:
(1) Methods to maintain the security of personal identifying
information and financial information, including, without limitation,
identifying unsolicited electronic communication which is sent for
the purpose of obtaining such personal and financial information for
an unlawful purpose;
(2) The necessity for secure passwords or other unique
identifiers;
(3) The effects of a computer contaminant;
(4) Methods to identify unsolicited commercial material; and
(5) The dangers associated with social networking Internet
sites; and
(d) A designation of the level of detail of instruction as
appropriate for the grade level of pupils who receive the instruction.
3. The standards for social studies must include multicultural
education, including, without limitation, information relating to
contributions made by men and women from various racial and
ethnic backgrounds. The Council shall consult with members of the
community who represent the racial and ethnic diversity of this
State in developing such standards.
4. The standards for health must include mental health and the
relationship between mental health and physical health.
-
*AB247_R1*

– 12 –
5. The Council shall establish standards of content and
performance for each grade level in kindergarten and grades 1 to 8,
inclusive, for English language arts and mathematics. The Council
shall establish standards of content and performance for the grade
levels selected by the Council for the other courses of study
prescribed in subsection 1.
6. The Council shall forward to the State Board the standards
of content and performance established by the Council for each
course of study. The State Board shall:
(a) Adopt the standards for each course of study, as submitted
by the Council; or
(b) If the State Board objects to the standards for a course of
study or a particular grade level for a course of study, return those
standards to the Council with a written explanation setting forth the
reason for the objection.
7. If the State Board returns to the Council the standards of
content and performance for a course of study or a grade level, the
Council shall:
(a) Consider the objection provided by the State Board and
determine whether to revise the standards based upon the objection;
and
(b) Return the standards or the revised standards, as applicable,
to the State Board.
 The State Board shall adopt the standards of content and
performance or the revised standards, as applicable.
8. The Council shall work in cooperation with the State Board
to prescribe the examinations required by NRS 390.105.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Computer contaminant” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 205.4737.
(b) “Cyber-bullying” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 388.123.
(c) “Electronic communication” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 388.124.
Sec. 4. 1. The Department of Education shall conduct a
study during the 2025-2026 interim to determine the need for a
school for pupils who are deaf or hard of hearing.
2. In conducting the study, the Department of Education shall
consult with and solicit input from persons and organizations who
advocate for or provide services to children who are deaf or hard of
hearing.
3. The study must include, without limitation:
(a) An assessment of issues facing pupils who are deaf or hard
of hearing in public schools in Nevada.
-
*AB247_R1*

– 13 –
(b) An assessment of current public school programs for pupils
who are deaf or hard of hearing in Nevada.
(c) Statistical information on the number of pupils in each
school district who are deaf or hard of hearing.
4. Not later than December 31, 2026, the Department of
Education shall prepare and submit a report on the findings of the
study conducted pursuant to subsection 1 to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the 84th Session of
the Nevada Legislature.
Sec. 5. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB247_R1*